Alaska statutes. Title 2. Aeronautics.
Article 6. General Provisions.

Sec. 02.15.190.
Collection of aeronautical data.

The department may collect, assemble, and publish aeronautical data pertinent to the operation of aircraft within the state. This data is for the benefit of the aviation industry and the general public, and may not duplicate data published by any other governmental agency.

History.

(§ 7 ch 123 SLA 1949)

Sec. 02.15.200.
Public nature of department activities.

The acquisition of land or interests in land under this chapter, the planning, acquisition, establishment, construction, improvement, maintenance, equipment, and operation of airports and air navigation facilities, whether by the state separately or jointly with any person or municipality, and the exercise of any other powers granted under this chapter to the department are public and governmental functions, exercised for a public purpose, and matters of public necessity. All land and other property and privileges acquired and used by or on behalf of the state in the manner and for the purposes enumerated in this chapter are acquired and used for public and governmental purposes and as a matter of public necessity.

History.

(§ 8 A ch 123 SLA 1949)

Administrative Code. —

For international airports generally, see 17 AAC 42, art. 1.

For authorization for use of international airport property, see 17 AAC 42, art. 2.

For competitive award, see 17 AAC 42, art. 3.

For public notice; lease, permit, and concession terms and cancellation, see 17 AAC 42, art. 4.

For rural airports generally, see 17 AAC 45, art. 1.

For authorization for use of rural airport property, see 17 AAC 45, art. 2.

For competitive award, see 17 AAC 45, art. 3.

For public notice; lease, permit, and concession terms; insurance; and cancellation, see 17 AAC 45, art. 4.

Sec. 02.15.205.
Approval required for airport construction. [Repealed, § 14 ch 56 SLA 2001.]

Sec. 02.15.210.
Exclusive rights prohibited.

The department may not grant an exclusive right for the use of an airway, airport, or air navigation facility under its jurisdiction.
This section does not prevent the making of contracts, leases, and other arrangements under AS

02.15.060

—

02.15.100

and

02.15.120

, including exclusive contracts for the sale and delivery of in-bond merchandise described in AS

02.15.091

.

History.

(§ 8 B ch 123 SLA 1949; am § 3 ch 111 SLA 1982)

Administrative Code. —

For authorization for use of international airport property, see 17 AAC 42, art. 2.

For competitive award, see 17 AAC 42, art. 3.

For authorization for use of rural airport property, see 17 AAC 45, art. 2.

For competitive award, see 17 AAC 45, art. 3.

For airport closure; disposal of state-owned airport property, see 17 AAC 45, art. 7.

Sec. 02.15.220.
Enforcement of aeronautics laws.

The department and its officers and employees, and every state and municipal officer charged with the enforcement of state and municipal laws, shall enforce and assist in the enforcement of this chapter and of all regulations adopted and orders issued under it and any other state regulations or laws pertaining to the operation of aircraft.

[Repealed, § 14 ch 56 SLA 2001.]

History.

(§ 13 ch 123 SLA 1949; am § 14 ch 56 SLA 2001)

Administrative Code. —

For international airports generally, see 17 AAC 42, art. 1.

For public notice; lease, permit, and concession terms and cancellation, see 17 AAC 42, art. 4.

For airport closure and construction, see 17 AAC 42, art. 7.

For first amendment activity at international airports, see 17 AAC 42, art. 8.

For rural airports generally, see 17 AAC 45, art. 1.

For public notice; lease, permit, and concession terms; insurance; and cancellation, see 17 AAC 45, art. 4.

For airport closure; disposal of state-owned airport property, see 17 AAC 45, art. 7.

For first amendment activity at rural airports, see 17 AAC 45, art. 8.

Sec. 02.15.225.
Accidents involving state or municipal aircraft. [Repealed, § 14 ch 56 SLA 2001.]

Sec. 02.15.230.
Police powers vested.

The commissioner and those officers and employees of the department whom the commissioner may designate have general police powers in aid of the enforcement of this chapter and the regulations and orders issued under it and all other laws of the state relating to aeronautics.

Upon bilateral agreement, the commissioner may designate individuals licensed under AS

18.65.400

—18.65.490 and police officers employed by the state or its political subdivisions to be present during the final passenger screening process before the boarding of each flight required to be in compliance with passenger screening regulations of the Federal Aviation Administration. Persons designated under this section, while performing their duties under that agreement, have the general police powers set out in (a) of this section.

History.

(§ 13 B ch 123 SLA 1949; am § 2 ch 6 SLA 1978; am § 1 ch 35 SLA 2003)

Administrative Code. —

For international airports generally, see 17 AAC 42, art. 1.

For public notice; lease, permit, and concession terms and cancellation, see 17 AAC 42, art. 4.

For airport closure and construction, see 17 AAC 42, art. 7.

For first amendment activity at international airports, see 17 AAC 42, art. 8.

For rural airports generally, see 17 AAC 45, art. 1.

For public notice; lease, permit, and concession terms; insurance; and cancellation, see 17 AAC 45, art. 4.

For airport closure; disposal of state-owned airport property, see 17 AAC 45, art. 7.

For first amendment activity at rural airports, see 17 AAC 45, art. 8.

Sec. 02.15.240.
Penalties.

A person violating a provision of this chapter, or a provision of a regulation adopted or order issued under this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction is punishable by a fine of not more than $500, or by imprisonment of not more than 90 days, or by both.

For a violation of any section of this chapter, in addition to or in lieu of the penalties provided by (a) of this section, or as a condition to the suspension of a sentence which may be imposed, the court may prohibit the violator from operating an aircraft within the state for a period it may determine but not more than one year. Violation of the prohibition of court may be treated as a separate offense under this section or as a contempt of court. Whenever a conviction is obtained, the prosecuting authority shall notify the department.

History.

(§ 12 ch 123 SLA 1949)

Cross references. —

For contempt of court, see AS

09.50.010

.

Administrative Code. —

For international airports generally, see 17 AAC 42, art. 1.

For rural airports generally, see 17 AAC 45, art. 1.

Sec. 02.15.250.
Aeronautical fund. [Repealed, § 2 ch 14 SLA 1968.]

Sec. 02.15.260.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“aeronautics” means the science and art of flight including but not limited to transportation by aircraft; the operation, construction, repair, or maintenance of aircraft power plants and accessories, including the repair, packing, and maintenance of parachutes; the design, establishment, construction, extension, operation, improvement, repair, or maintenance of airports or other air navigation facilities; and instruction in flying or related ground subjects;

“aircraft” means a contrivance used or designed for navigation of flight in the air;

“airman” means an individual engaging as the person in command or as pilot, mechanic, or member of the crew, in the navigation of aircraft while under way; an individual directly in charge of the inspection, maintenance, overhauling, or repair of aircraft, aircraft engines, propellers, or appliances; and an individual serving in the capacity of aircraft dispatcher, or air-traffic control-tower operator; or an individual employed by a manufacturer of aircraft, aircraft engines, propellers, or appliances to perform duties as inspector or mechanic in that connection; or an individual performing inspection or mechanical duties in connection with aircraft owned or operated by the individual in the state of Alaska;

“air navigation facility” means a facility used, available, or designed for use in aid of air navigation, including structures, mechanisms, lights, beacons, markers, communicating systems, or other instrumentalities or devices used or useful as an aid, or constituting an advantage or convenience to the safe taking-off, navigation and landing of aircraft, or the safe and efficient operation or maintenance of an airport, and any combination of any or all of the facilities;

“airport” means an area of land or water that is used or intended for use for the landing and take-off of aircraft, and any appurtenant areas that are used or intended for use for airport buildings or other airport facilities or rights-of-way, together with airport buildings and facilities located thereon;

“airport hazard” means a structure, object of natural growth, or use of land that obstructs the airspace required for the flight of aircraft in landing or taking off at an airport or is otherwise hazardous to the landing or taking off;

“cargo” means goods carried by an airline that are carried under an agreement between the shipper and the airline other than a passenger ticket, that are accepted, carried, and handled separately from passenger baggage, and that are delivered to a location other than a baggage claim area; “cargo” does not include goods carried by an airline as baggage, whether belly-loaded or hand-carried and whether accompanied or unaccompanied by a passenger;

“civil aircraft” means any aircraft other than a public aircraft;

“commissioner” means the commissioner of transportation and public facilities of the state;

“cost of change, relocation, or removal” means the entire cost incurred by the utility properly attributed to the change, relocation, or removal of a facility, less the costs for improvements or upgrading over and above the cost of a functionally equal facility; if a facility is to be relocated and replaced with new equipment, there shall also be subtracted from the entire cost the salvage value derived from the old facility;

“department” means the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities;

“encroachment” includes a tower, pole, poleline, pipe, pipeline, driveway, private road, fence, billboard, stand, or building, or structure or object of any kind that is or has been placed in, on, under, or over a portion of an airport;

“international airport” means an international airport owned and operated by the state;

“operation of aircraft” means the use, navigation, or piloting of aircraft in the airspace over this state or upon an airport inside this state; “operate aircraft” means to use, navigate, or pilot aircraft in the airspace over this state or upon an airport inside this state;

“public aircraft” means an aircraft used exclusively in the governmental service of the United States or the state government;

“utility” includes a corporation, company, individual, or association of individuals, or a lessee, trustee, or court-appointed receiver, that owns, operates, manages, or controls a line, plant, pipeline, or system for furnishing, producing, generating, transmitting, or distributing power, electricity, communications, telecommunications, water, gas, oil, petroleum products, coal or other mineral slurry, steam, heat, light, chemicals, air, sewage, drainage not connected with airport drainage, irrigation, or similar products including publicly owned fire and police signal systems and street lighting systems that directly or indirectly serve the public or a segment of the public; “utility” also includes a corporation, company, individual, or association of individuals, or a lessee, trustee, or court-appointed receiver that owns, operates, manages, or controls a system for furnishing transportation of goods or persons by means of a railway, tramway, cableway, conveyor, flume, canal, tunnel, pipeline, or a similar means;

“utility facility” includes poles, plants, lines, trenches, bridges, utilidors, tunnels, pipelines, and any other system for furnishing, producing, generating, transmitting, or distributing power, electricity, communications, telecommunications, water, gas, oil, petroleum products, coal or other mineral slurry, steam, heat, light, chemicals, air, sewage, drainage not connected with an airport drainage system, irrigation, or another substance; “utility facility” also includes a system for furnishing transportation of goods or persons by means of a railway, tramway, cableway, conveyor, flume, canal, tunnel, pipeline, or a similar means.

History.

(§ 1 ch 123 SLA 1949; am § 53 ch 127 SLA 1974; am § 4 ch 111 SLA 1982; am § 4 ch 6 SLA 1984; am § 2 ch 142 SLA 1986; am § 62 ch 21 SLA 1991; am § 1 ch 58 SLA 2010)

Revisor’s notes. —

Reorganized in 1986 to alphabetize the defined terms. In 1998, former paragraphs (15) — (18) were renumbered as (14) — (17) to reflect the 1991 repeal of former paragraph (14).

Administrative Code. —

For utility permits, see 17 AAC 15, art. 1.

Sec. 02.15.270.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the Alaska Aeronautics Act of 1949.

History.

(§ 17 ch 123 SLA 1949)

Revisor’s notes. —

The words “of 1949” were added by the revisor to differentiate this act from “The Alaska Aeronautics Act of 1937” which is found in AS

02.10.010

— 02.10.090.